Mississippi statutes. Title 85. Debtor-Creditor Relationship
Chapter 11. Mississippi Uniform State Tax Lien Registration Act

§ 85-11-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Mississippi Uniform State Tax Lien Registration Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 412, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§ 85-11-3.
Purpose and scope of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide a uniform statewide system for filing notices of tax liens to be maintained by the Department of Revenue that are in favor of or enforced by the Mississippi Department of Revenue.

The scope of this chapter is limited to tax liens in real property and personal property, tangible and intangible, of taxpayers or other persons against whom the Mississippi Department of Revenue has liens pursuant to law for unpaid finally determined tax liabilities administered by the Mississippi Department of Revenue.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 412, § 2, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§ 85-11-5.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Revenue of the Mississippi Department of Revenue.

“Debtor” and “judgment debtor” means a taxpayer or other person against whom there is an unpaid finally determined tax liability collectible by the Mississippi Department of Revenue.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Revenue.

“Finally determined tax liabilities” means any state tax, fee, penalty, and/or interest owed by a person to the Mississippi Department of Revenue where the assessment of the liability is not subject to any further timely filed administrative or judicial review.

“Last-known address of the debtor” means the address of the debtor appearing on the records of the department at the time the notice of tax lien is enrolled in the Uniform State Tax Lien Registry.

“Person” means an individual, organization or legal entity.

“Uniform State Tax Lien Registry” or “Tax Lien Registry” means the public database maintained by the department wherein tax liens enrolled in favor of and enforced by the department are filed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 412, § 3, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§ 85-11-7.
Notice of tax lien; enrollment in tax lien registry.

If any person refuses to pay any finally determined tax liabilities, the commissioner may enroll in the tax lien registry a notice of tax lien for the finally determined tax liabilities due.

The notice of tax lien file shall include:

The name and last-known address of the debtor;

The name and address of the department;

The tax lien number assigned to the lien by the department; and

The basis for the tax lien, including, but not limited to, the amount owed as of the date of enrollment in the tax lien registry.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 412, § 4, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§ 85-11-9.
Perfection of tax lien; tax lien as authority for issuance of writs and warrants.

When a notice of tax lien is enrolled by the department in the tax lien registry, the tax lien is perfected and shall be attached to all of the existing and after-acquired property of the debtor, both real and personal, tangible and intangible, which is located in any and all counties within the State of Mississippi.

The perfected tax lien shall be valid as against mortgagees, pledgees, entrusters, purchasers, judgment creditors, and other persons from the time of enrollment in the tax lien registry.

The amount of the tax lien shall be a debt due the State of Mississippi and shall remain a lien upon all property and rights to property belonging to the debtor, both real and personal, tangible and intangible, which is located in any and all counties within the State of Mississippi, including choses in action, with the same force and like effect as any enrolled judgment of a court of record. Interest and penalty shall accrue on the tax lien at the same rate and with the same restrictions, if any, as specified by statute for the accrual of interest and penalty for the type of tax or taxes for which the tax lien was issued.

The notice of tax lien shall serve as authority for issuance of writs of execution, writs of attachment, writs of garnishment, or other remedial writs. In addition to those writs, the notice of tax lien shall also serve as authority for the commissioner to issue warrants under Sections 27-7-57, 27-13-31 and 27-65-59 for the collection of the tax lien. The tax lien enrolled in the tax lien registry shall constitute the judgment enrolled for the payment of the amount of tax, penalties, and interest referred to in Sections 27-7-57, 27-13-31 and 27-65-59, but the warrant issued for a tax lien enrolled on a tax lien registry shall direct and authorize the special agent to seize and sell the real and personal property found anywhere within this state that belongs to the taxpayer against whom the tax lien was enrolled and not just property in a specific county. Once issued, the execution of the warrants shall be in accordance with Section 27-3-33(4) for the levy on salaries, compensation or other monies due the delinquent taxpayer; Sections 27-7-61 through 27-7-67 in regard to income tax and withholding tax; Sections 27-13-35 through 27-13-41 for franchise tax; and Sections 27-65-63 through 27-65-69 for sales tax and any other tax or fee administered by the department that utilizes the administrative provisions of the sales tax law in the administration of the tax or fee. Under warrants issued for the tax liens enrolled in the tax lien registry, any property, real or personal, within the State of Mississippi is subject to levy under Section 27-3-33(4) if the person that owes the salary, compensation or other monies to the debtor is subject to service of process in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 412, § 5, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§ 85-11-11.
Payments to circuit clerks for service provided to citizens for researching and providing lien information.

Beginning with calendar year 2015 and each year thereafter, on January 15 and July 15 of each year, the department shall pay to the Mississippi circuit clerks an amount equal to half of the yearly average amount paid for the three (3) fiscal year periods ending June 30, 2011, 2012 and 2013, to each county for the enrollment, reenrollment, and/or release of the tax liens under this chapter. The payment shall be used for the service provided to citizens that request assistance from circuit clerks for researching and providing lien information, whether such information is on the lien registry or included in historical documents. The clerks shall report the number of citizens assisted to the department on or before June 30 of each year. The commissioner is authorized to pay the clerks out of funds appropriated by the Legislature to defray expenses of the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 412, § 6, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§ 85-11-13.
Effect of notice of tax lien; duration of lien; reenrollment of tax lien.

A notice of tax lien shall be a lien upon the debtor’s property located anywhere in the state for a period of seven (7) years from the date of enrollment unless:

It is sooner released by the department; or

The department reenrolls the notice of tax lien before the expiration of the seven (7) years. There shall be no limit upon the number of times that the department may reenroll notices of tax liens.

In the event that a notice of tax lien lapses on the expiration of seven (7) years, the notice of tax lien may, at any time thereafter and in the sole discretion of the department, be reenrolled. A notice of tax lien that is reenrolled pursuant to this subsection shall be fully enforceable as of the date of reenrollment; however, any notice of tax lien that is reenrolled after the lapse of the seven-year period shall lose the priority it had prior to its expiration. There shall be no limit upon the number of times that the department may reenroll notices of tax liens in this manner.

If the department reenrolls a notice of tax lien, the notice of tax lien in regard to that reenrollment shall contain the following information:

The name and last-known address of the debtor;

The name and address of the department;

An indication that the notice of tax lien is for a previously enrolled lien;

The tax lien number assigned to the lien by the department; and

The basis for the tax lien, including, but not limited to, the amount owed as of the date of reenrollment in the tax lien registry.

The reenrollment of a tax lien in the tax lien registry within the seven-year period shall constitute a continuation of the tax lien appearing on the judgment roll of the county as it relates to real and personal property belonging to the debtor in that county; however, the reenrolled tax lien shall attach to all property and all rights to property belonging to the debtor, both real and personal, tangible and intangible, located in any and all counties within the state as of the date of the reenrollment in the tax lien registry. A notice of release of tax lien filed in the tax lien registry shall constitute a release of tax lien within the department, the tax lien registry, and/or the county in which the tax lien was previously enrolled. The information contained on the tax lien registry shall be controlling, and any inconsistencies found between the tax lien registry and the judgment roll of any county shall be superseded by the tax lien registry.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 412, § 7, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§ 85-11-15.
Cancellation of notice of tax lien upon discovery of administrative issue.

Within two (2) working days from the date the department discovers an administrative issue in the filing of a notice of tax lien in the tax lien registry, it may cancel a notice of tax lien from the tax lien registry and file a notice of release of the tax lien due to administrative correction. The notice of tax lien shall be treated as though never enrolled.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 412, § 8, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§ 85-11-17.
Release of tax lien; enrollment of new tax lien under certain circumstances.

Within fifteen (15) working days from the receipt by the department of full payment of a tax lien enrolled in the tax lien registry, including payment of any additionally accruing interest, penalty, fees and/or costs, the department shall file in the tax lien registry a notice of release of the tax lien being paid.

In the event that a notice or release of tax lien is issued in error by the department and enrolled in the tax lien registry; or the form of payment received by the department is not honored and/or the transfer of payment to the department is not completed for any reason after the notice of release of tax lien is enrolled in the tax lien registry; or the department is required to return and/or turn over the payment received to the taxpayer or other person due to bankruptcy, a court order, or other proceedings after the notice of release of the tax lien issued is enrolled in the tax lien registry; the department, in its sole discretion, may enroll a new tax lien for the finally determined tax liabilities represented in the tax lien for which the tax lien was issued, including any additional accruing interest, penalty and/or fees to the date of the new enrollment. A notice of tax lien that is enrolled pursuant to this provision shall be fully enforceable as of the date of the new enrollment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 412, § 9, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§ 85-11-19.
Tax lien registry; information to be included; certification of records on the tax lien registry; sale of bulk information appearing on tax lien registry; limitation on uses of tax lien registry information.

The department shall maintain notices of tax liens filed in the tax lien registry after January 1, 2015 in its information management system in a form that permits them to be readily accessible in an electronic form through the Internet and to be reduced to printed form. The electronic and printed form shall include the following information:

The name of the taxpayer as judgment debtor;

The name and address of the department;

The tax lien number assigned to the lien by the department;

Whether the enrollment is the first enrollment of the tax lien or a reenrollment of the tax lien;

The amount of the taxes, penalties, interest, and fees indicated due on the notice of tax lien received from the department; and

The date and time of enrollment or reenrollment.

The department shall not charge for the access to information on the enrollment of tax liens by name of judgment debtor or by tax lien number. The department is, however, authorized to charge for the certification of any record or lack of records appearing on the tax lien registry. The department shall determine the process by which such tax lien registry certification can be requested, including a charge for such certification that shall cover at least the cost of providing the certification. The payment of the charge for a tax lien registry certification shall be retained by the department as reimbursement of its cost to provide the certification.

The department is authorized to sell at bulk the information appearing on the tax lien registry. In selling the information, the department shall determine the process by which the information will be sold and the media or method by which it will be available to the purchaser and shall set a price for the information that will at least cover the cost of producing the information. The proceeds from the sale of bulk information shall be retained by the department and used to cover its cost to produce the information sold and to maintain the tax lien registry.

Tax lien registry information, whether accessed by name of judgment debtor or by tax lien number at no charge, through a bulk sale of information or by other means, will not be used for a survey, marketing or solicitation purposes. Survey, marketing or solicitation purpose shall not include any action by the department or its authorized agent to collect a debt represented by a tax lien appearing in the tax lien registry. The department or the Attorney General is hereby authorized to bring an action to enjoin the unlawful use of tax lien registry information for a survey, marketing or solicitation purpose and to recover the cost of such action, including reasonable attorney’s fees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 412, § 10, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§ 85-11-21.
Enrollment on tax lien registry of certain unsatisfied tax liens appearing on county judgment rolls.

All tax liens currently enrolled appearing on the judgment rolls of the counties of this state as of January 1, 2015 and which the department does not show as satisfied or as issued in error and which were last enrolled or reenrolled on the judgment rolls within seven (7) years before January 1, 2015 shall be immediately enrolled on the tax lien registry on January 1, 2015, and shall have the force and effect of a judgment on all real and personal property belonging to the debtor anywhere in the state for a duration of seven (7) years effective from the date of the enrollment on the tax lien registry unless and until such time as either the notice of tax lien is released or the department reenrolls the tax lien in the tax lien registry.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 412, § 11, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§ 85-11-23.
Rules and regulations.

The department shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations, not inconsistent with this chapter, as it may deem necessary to enforce its provisions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 412, § 12, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.